Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6606SV (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. 2375 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8A.316A Fire fighting foam ââ 1 master contract. 2 The department shall establish a master contract pursuant 3 to section 8A.311A for the purchase of fire fighting foam 4 from a seller whose product contains the greatest content of 5 soybean-based materials without containing perfluoroalkyl or 6 polyfluoroalkyl substances or fluorine components. 7 Sec. 2. LOCAL GOVERNMENT PURCHASES. A local government 8 entity with authority over a fire department shall pass an 9 ordinance by January 1, 2027, determining whether the entity 10 will purchase soybean-based fire fighting foam. 11